Illinois, session 104th, SB1416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Public Health for local health 7protection grants for health protection programs. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 9Effective July 1, 2025.